Alaska, session 34, HB61.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 23.10.060(d)(14) is amended to read: 06 (14) work performed by an employee under a voluntary flexible work 07 hour plan that does not exceed 40 hours a week and 12 hours a day if 08 (A) the employee and the employer have signed a written 09 agreement establishing the daily and weekly hours worked by the employee 10 under the plan and the written agreement has been filed with the department; 11 and 12 (B) the department has issued a certificate approving the plan 13 [THAT STATES THE WORK IS FOR 40 HOURS A WEEK AND NOT 14 MORE THAN 10 HOURS A DAY]; for work exceeding [OVER 40 HOURS 01 A WEEK OR 10 HOURS A DAY UNDER] a flexible work hour plan not 02 included as part of a collective bargaining agreement, compensation at the rate 03 of one and one-half times the regular rate of pay shall be paid for the overtime; 04 * Sec. 2. AS 23.10.332(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) Except for employment exempted under AS 23.10.330 and (e) of this 06 section and other employment specifically exempted by regulations adopted by the 07 department, a minor under 16 [17] years of age may only [NOT] be employed by or 08 allowed to work for an employer who has received a general written authorization 09 to employ minors from [WITHOUT THE WRITTEN AUTHORIZATION OF] the 10 commissioner unless authorized under AS 23.10.360 [OR UNDER (c) OF THIS 11 SECTION]. 12 * Sec. 3. AS 23.10.332 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 13 (e) An employer is not required to obtain written authorization under (a) of 14 this section to employ a minor under the direct supervision of a family member of the 15 minor in a business owned and operated by the family member or on a boat owned and 16 operated by the family member. In this subsection, "family member" means a parent, 17 grandparent, adult sibling, aunt, or uncle. 18 * Sec. 4. AS 23.10.340(a) is amended to read: 19 (a) A minor under 16 years of age may not be employed for more than a 20 combined total of 10 [NINE] hours school attendance and employment in one day. If 21 employed, the minor's work may be performed only between 5 a.m. and 9 p.m. 22 Domestic work and baby sitting excepted, employment [EMPLOYMENT 23 OUTSIDE SCHOOL HOURS] may not exceed 23 hours in one week when school is 24 in session or 40 hours in one week when school is not in session [, DOMESTIC 25 WORK AND BABY-SITTING EXCEPTED]. 26 * Sec. 5. AS 23.10.332(c) and 23.10.332(d) are repealed. 27 * Sec. 6. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 28 read: 29 REVISOR'S INSTRUCTION. The revisor of statutes is requested to change the catch 30 line for AS 23.10.332 from "Authorization for children under 17 to work" to "Authorization 31 to employ children under 16." Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.